Maryland, session 2026, SB0729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Community group” means a nonprofit entity with the capacity to conduct
tenant outreach and provide engagement, education, and information.
(c) “Covered individual” means an individual who:
(1) Occupies a residential property under a claim of legal right other than
owner, including [a]:
(I) A tenant in a building owned, operated, or managed by a public
housing authority; and
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO OCCUPIES PREMISES OF A MOBILE
HOME PARK UNDER TITLE 8A OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) Is a member of a household with an income that is not greater than 50%
of the median income, adjusted for household size, in the State as determined by the United
States Department of Health and Human Services or its successor.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
(d) “Designated organization” means a nonprofit entity designated by MLSC with
the ability to provide legal representation to covered individuals.
(e) “Fund” means the Access to Counsel in Evictions Special Fund.
(f) “Legal representation” includes all representation by an attorney beyond brief
legal advice and is not limited to the formal entry of appearance in court.
(g) “MLSC” means the Maryland Legal Services Corporation.
(h) “Program” means the Access to Counsel in Evictions Program.
(I) “RESIDENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 8A–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(i)] (J) “Task Force” means the Access to Counsel in Evictions Task Force.
8–903.
(a) There is an Access to Counsel in Evictions Program administered by MLSC.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to organize and direct services and resources
in order to provide all covered individuals in the State with access to legal representation
as required under this subtitle.
8–904.
(a) (1) Under the Program, MLSC shall provide for access to legal
representation by a covered individual for a judicial or administrative proceeding to [evict]:
(I) EVICT or terminate the tenancy or housing subsidy of a covered
individual[, including]; OR
(II) REPOSSESS THE PREMISES OF A COVERED INDIVIDUAL
UNDER TITLE 8A OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) THE ACCESS TO LEGAL REPRESENTATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION INCLUDES the first appeal of a decision in the proceeding if the
designated organization determines that there are sufficient legal grounds for the appeal.
(b) (1) Under the Program, a designated organization shall ensure that a
covered individual receives access to legal representation by an attorney in a proceeding as
required under this subtitle as soon as possible after:
(i) A landlord provides notice to terminate a tenancy;
– 3 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) A PARK OWNER PROVIDES A RESIDENT OR SUBTENANT A
NOTICE OF INTENT TO FILE A COMPLAINT FOR REPOSSESSION OF THE PREMISES
UNDER § 8A–1701 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(III) The initiation of an eviction proceeding; or
[(iii)] (IV) The determination by a designated organization that a
proceeding related to a constructive eviction on behalf of a covered individual should be
initiated.
(2) If feasible, legal representation required under this subsection should
begin no later than the time of the covered individual’s first appearance in a proceeding.
(c) MLSC may contract with a designated organization to provide all or part of
the services required under this section.
8–905.
(a) MLSC shall develop an informational pamphlet in both English and other
languages MLSC determines appropriate:
(1) Describing the legal rights of tenants AND RESIDENTS and the access
to counsel established under this subtitle; and
(2) Providing information on resources available to tenants AND
RESIDENTS.
(b) A sheriff or constable shall provide a copy of the pamphlet described under
subsection (a) of this section in addition to the process served on a tenant, an assignee, or
a subtenant in accordance with the following provisions of this article:
(1) An eviction proceeding for a failure to pay rent under § 8–401 of this
title;
(2) An eviction proceeding for a tenant holding over under § 8–402 of this
title; [and]
(3) An eviction proceeding for a breach of lease under § 8–402.1 of this title;
AND
(4) A REPOSSESSION PROCEEDING UNDER TITLE 8A, SUBTITLE 17
OF THIS ARTICLE.
8–906.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
MLSC shall designate and contract with appropriate community groups to conduct
outreach and provide education to tenants AND RESIDENTS locally and throughout the
State regarding [tenants’] THE rights and [the] access to legal representation under this
subtitle.
8–907.
On or before August 31 each year, MLSC shall report to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly the
following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year:
(1) The number of cases in which a covered individual was provided legal
representation, disaggregated by case type, including:
(i) Nonpayment of rent under § 8–401 of this title OR § 8A–1702 §
8A–1701 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(ii) [Tenant holdover] HOLDOVER under § 8–402 of this title OR §
8A–1703 8A–1702 OF THIS ARTICLE; [and]
(iii) Breach of lease under § 8–402.1 of this title; AND
(IV) BREACH OF RENTAL AGREEMENT UNDER § 8A–1704 §
8A–1703 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) The amount paid to attorneys for each case managed;
(3) The geographic distribution of cases;
(4) Data on the disposition of cases decided;
(5) The amount of State and federal funds allocated to each designated
organization; and
(6) The number of covered individuals provided legal representation for
multiple cases.
8A–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Gratuity” includes donation, bonus, fee, or gift.
(c) (1) “Mobile home” means a structure:
(i) Transportable in one or more sections;
– 5 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) 8 or more body feet in width and 30 or more body feet in length;
(iii) Built on a permanent chassis; and
(iv) Designed to be used as a dwelling, with or without a permanent
foundation, when connected to the required utilities.
(2) “Mobile home” includes the plumbing, heating, air conditioning, and
electrical systems contained in the structure.
(d) “Park” means any property leased or held out for lease to two or more residents
or prospective residents.
(e) “Park fee” means any fee, charge, or assessment charged for the use of the
park or for services rendered.
(f) “Park owner” means any person who has interest in the park and includes any
person acting as the agent of a park owner as to the managerial or operations acts taken
as the agent of the owner.
(g) “Premises” means any:
(1) Lot, plot, site, or parcel in the park; or
(2) Building, structure, or mobile home in the park.
(h) “Rent” means any money or other consideration given for the right of use,
possession, and occupancy of the premises.
(i) “Rental agreement” means any written understanding between a resident and
park owner whereby the resident is entitled to place his mobile home on a site in the park
for payment of consideration to the park owner.
(j) (1) “Resident” means a mobile home owner who leases or rents a site for
residential use and resides in a mobile home park.
(2) “Resident” includes a person who maintains a permanent residence
with the mobile home owner, and who obtains title to the mobile home after the death of
the owner under the terms of a will or by operation of law.
(k) “Rule” means any rule established by the owner.
(l) “Security deposit” means any payment of money, including payment of last
month’s rent in advance of the time it is due, given to a park owner by a resident in order
to protect the park owner against nonpayment of rent or damage to the leased premises.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
(m) (1) “SUBSTANTIAL VIOLATION” MEANS ONE OF THE FOLLOWING
ACTIONS BY A RESIDENT:
(I) POSING A SERIOUS AND IMMEDIATE THREAT TO THE
HEALTH, SAFETY, OR PROPERTY OF THE PARK OWNER, ANOTHER RESIDENT, OR ANY
OTHER PERSON AT THE PARK; OR
(II) CONTINUING ANY OF THE FOLLOWING BEHAVIORS AFTER
WRITTEN NOTICE FROM THE PARK OWNER AND AN OPPORTUNITY TO CORRECT THE
BEHAVIOR:
1. MATERIALLY IMPAIRING THE USE OF THE PARK OR
THE PEACE AND QUIET OF OTHER RESIDENTS; OR
2. WILLFULLY AND REPEATEDLY DISREGARDING THE
RULES OF THE RENTAL AGREEMENT.
(2) “SUBSTANTIAL VIOLATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE A VIOLATION OF
A PROVISION OF THE PARK RULES OR THE RENTAL AGREEMENT THAT A COURT
DETERMINES TO BE UNCONSCIONABLE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8A–1502 OF THIS
TITLE.
(N) (1) “Utility service” means any service available to the premises from a
private or public central source. [Such services may include]
(2) “UTILITY SERVICE” INCLUDES sewer, water, WELL WATER, SEPTIC,
electricity, telephone, gas, oil, and cable television.
(O) “UTILITY VENDOR” MEANS A PERSON THAT IS IN THE BUSINESS OF
PROVIDING A UTILITY SERVICE.
(P) “WELL WATER SERVICE” INCLUDES ASSOCIATED SEWER OR SEPTIC
SERVICE.
8A–201.
(a) Before a current or prospective resident signs a rental agreement or occupies
the premises, a park owner shall:
(1) (I) Provide the prospective resident with a written notice identifying
the availability[,] AND capacity[, and connection fee] of all utility services at the proposed
site in order to assure the proper and adequate installation of the mobile home.
– 7 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) The prospective resident shall furnish to the park owner a
written acknowledgment of this notification and acceptance of the site as proposed.
(2) Deliver a copy of the rules and an explanation of any provision for
amendment of the rule.
(3) Deliver a copy of the rental agreement which shall contain the
following:
(i) A specific identification of the site to be leased;
(ii) A term of tenancy of at least 1 year;
(iii) A stipulation of:
1. The total amount of annual rental for the site;
2. The term of payment, whether monthly, quarterly,
semiannually, or annually;
3. The amount due for each installment;
4. The amount of any late payment fee; and
5. All park fees, in a manner that identifies the service to be
provided for each park fee;
(iv) A description of each general obligation of the resident and park
owner;
(v) A description of each service, facility, and utility service that the
park owner will provide;
(vi) A description of any termination and renewal option;
(vii) The text of [§ 8A–202(c)] § 8A–202(B) of this subtitle, which
defines “qualified resident”; and
(viii) A specific reference to this title as the law that governs the
relationships between the resident and park owner.
(b) (1) A rental agreement may not require an annual payment of rent for a
site.
(2) A prospective resident may request and a park owner may agree that
the resident make an annual payment of rent for the site.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
(C) (1) AN AGGRIEVED RESIDENT MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A
PARK OWNER FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) IF A COURT FINDS IN FAVOR OF A RESIDENT, THE COURT
SHALL ORDER THE PARK OWNER TO CURE THE VIOLATION AND OFFER AN UPDATED
RENTAL AGREEMENT TO THE RESIDENT IN WRITING WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE
DATE OF THE COURT ORDER.
(II) 1. AN UPDATED RENTAL AGREEMENT UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL:
A. OFFER A TERM OF TENANCY OF AT LEAST 1 YEAR; AND
B. CONTAIN TERMS AND CONDITIONS THAT ARE
SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO RENTAL AGREEMENTS OF OTHER RESIDENTS.
2. THE TERM OF THE TENANCY UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH MAY NOT COMMENCE BEFORE THE
DATE THAT THE RESIDENT ACCEPTS THE RENTAL AGREEMENT.
(3) (I) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE RESIDENT
RECEIVES THE UPDATED RENTAL AGREEMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE RESIDENT SHALL ACCEPT OR REJECT THE AGREEMENT.
(II) IF A RESIDENT REJECTS THE UPDATED RENTAL
AGREEMENT, THE COURT SHALL:
1. TERMINATE THE RENTAL AGREEMENT;
2. AWARD REASONABLE RELOCATION EXPENSES TO THE
RESIDENT; AND
3. PROVIDE THE RESIDENT A REASONABLE PERIOD OF
TIME TO RELOCATE.
(D) IF IN ANY PROCEEDING A COURT DETERMINES THAT A PARK OWNER
VIOLATED A PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, THE RESIDENT MAY RECOVER:
(1) DAMAGES NOT MORE THAN THREE TIMES THE MONTHLY RENT
PAID BY THE RESIDENT;
(2) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS; AND
– 9 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) ANY OTHER REMEDY THE COURT FINDS REASONABLE.
8A–202.
(a) (1) A park owner shall offer all [current and] prospective year–round
residents [a] AN INITIAL rental agreement for a period of [not less than] AT LEAST 1 year.
[(b)] (2) [Upon] ON the expiration of the [initial] term OF THE INITIAL
RENTAL AGREEMENT, the [resident] FOLLOWING RESIDENTS shall be on a
month–to–month term, unless a longer term is agreed to by the parties[, subject to the
modified provisions relating to the amount and payment of rent.]:
(I) A RESIDENT WHO IS NOT A QUALIFIED RESIDENT AND HAS
NOT ENTERED INTO A SUBSEQUENT RENTAL AGREEMENT WITH THE PARK OWNER;
AND
(II) A QUALIFIED RESIDENT WHO DOES NOT ACCEPT AN OFFER
FROM A PARK OWNER TO RENEW THE RENTAL AGREEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) A TERM OF A RENTAL AGREEMENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) IS SUBJECT TO THE MODIFICATION OF PROVISIONS
RELATING TO THE AMOUNT AND PAYMENT OF RENT; AND
(II) MAY BE TERMINATED BY EITHER PARTY ON 90 DAYS’
WRITTEN NOTICE.
[(c)] (B) (1) In this subsection, “qualified resident” means a [year–round]
resident who:
(i) [Has made rental payments on the due date or within any grace
period commonly permitted in the park during the preceding year;
(ii)] Within the [preceding] 6–month period IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING THE EXPIRATION OF THE EXISTING TERM, has not committed a [repeated]
SUBSTANTIAL violation of any rule or provision of the rental agreement [and, at the time
the term expires, no substantial violation exists]; and
[(iii)] (II) Owns a mobile home that REASONABLY meets the
standards of the park.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
[(2) (i) Before the expiration of a 1–year term, or upon request of the
resident at any time during a month–to–month term, a park owner shall offer to a qualified
resident a rental agreement for a 1–year period.
(ii) An offer of a rental agreement for a 1–year term to a qualified
resident shall:]
(2) A PARK OWNER SHALL OFFER A QUALIFIED RESIDENT A RENEWAL
OF A RENTAL AGREEMENT FOR A TERM OF AT LEAST 1 YEAR:
(I) BEFORE THE EXPIRATION OF AN EXISTING RENTAL
AGREEMENT; AND
(II) ON REQUEST OF THE RESIDENT, AT ANY TIME DURING A
MONTH–TO–MONTH TERM.
(3) SUBJECT TO MODIFIED PROVISIONS RELATING TO THE AMOUNT
AND PAYMENT OF RENT, A RENTAL AGREEMENT THAT IS OFFERED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL CONTAIN TERMS AND CONDITIONS
THAT ARE SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO THOSE OF THE EXISTING RENTAL
AGREEMENT.
(4) AN OFFER BY THE PARK OWNER TO A QUALIFIED RESIDENT
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
[1.] (I) Be delivered to the resident no later than [30] 90
days before the expiration of the existing term;
[2.] (II) Explain, in clear language[, a]:
1. A qualified resident’s right to [the 1–year term; and] BE
OFFERED A RENTAL AGREEMENT WITH A TERM OF AT LEAST 1 YEAR;
2. THE CRITERIA FOR A RESIDENT TO BE CLASSIFIED AS
A QUALIFIED RESIDENT AND HOW TO MAINTAIN THAT CLASSIFICATION;
3. THE VIOLATIONS THAT A RESIDENT MAY CURE TO
REMAIN CLASSIFIED AS A QUALIFIED RESIDENT AND HOW A RESIDENT MAY CURE A
VIOLATION; AND
4. THE CONSEQUENCES OF A LOSS OF CLASSIFICATION
AS A QUALIFIED RESIDENT; AND
– 11 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[3.] (III) Contain a statement that, if the resident chooses
not to [enter into a 1–year agreement] ACCEPT THE OFFER, the lease will continue on a
month–to–month term that can be discontinued by either party, [upon 30] ON 90 days’
WRITTEN notice.
(5) NOTWITHSTANDING THE TERM OF A RENTAL AGREEMENT THAT IS
RENEWED FOLLOWING AN OFFER UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, A QUALIFIED RESIDENT
MAY TERMINATE THE RENTAL AGREEMENT 90 DAYS AFTER PROVIDING WRITTEN
NOTICE TO THE PARK OWNER.
(6) (I) IF A PARK OWNER DOES NOT INTEND TO OFFER A RESIDENT
A RENEWAL OF THE RENTAL AGREEMENT ON THE BASIS THAT THE RESIDENT IS NOT
A QUALIFIED RESIDENT, THE PARK OWNER SHALL PROVIDE THE RESIDENT WITH
WRITTEN NOTICE AT LEAST 90 DAYS BEFORE THE EXPIRATION OF THE EXISTING
TERM.
(II) A NOTICE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
SHALL:
1. STATE THE SPECIFIC REASON WHY THE PARK OWNER
DETERMINED THAT THE RESIDENT IS NOT A QUALIFIED RESIDENT; AND
2. PROVIDE THE RESIDENT WITH AN OPPORTUNITY TO:
A. MEET WITH THE PARK OWNER TO REVIEW THE BASIS
FOR THE DECISION OF THE PARK OWNER; AND
B. PRESENT INFORMATION TO THE PARK OWNER TO
SUPPORT A RECONSIDERATION OF THE DECISION.
[(3)] (C) If the use of land is changed:
[(i)] (1) All residents shall be entitled to a 1–year prior written
notice of termination notwithstanding the provisions of a longer term in a rental
agreement; and
[(ii)] (2) The park owner shall send to the local governing body of
the county or municipal corporation in which the park is located a copy of the written notice
of termination sent to the residents under item [(i)] (1) of this [paragraph] SUBSECTION.
[(4) If a resident’s rental agreement is not renewed on the basis that the
resident is not a qualified resident, the park owner shall, within 5 days, provide the resident
with a written statement of the specific reason for nonrenewal of the rental agreement.]
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
[(5)] (D) A resident who has been offered a 1–year rental agreement under
this section, and who has selected a month–to–month term and has not requested a 1–year
rental agreement under this section, is not entitled to a 1–year rental agreement after a
notice to terminate is delivered by certified mail to the resident by the park owner.
[(d)] (E) If any rental agreement contains a provision calling for an automatic
renewal of the lease term unless prior notice is given by the party or parties seeking to
terminate the rental agreement, that provision shall be distinctly set apart from any other
provision of the rental agreement and provide a space for the written acknowledgment of
the resident’s agreement to the automatic renewal provision. Such provision not specifically
accompanied by either the resident’s initials, signature, or witnessed mark is unenforceable
by the park owner.
[(e)] (F) (1) A rental agreement may not contain ANY PROVISION THAT:
[(1)] (I) [A provision whereby] REQUIRES the resident [authorizes] TO
AUTHORIZE any person to confess judgment on a claim arising out of the rental
agreement[.];
[(2)] (II) [A provision whereby] REQUIRES the resident [agrees] to waive
or to forego any right or remedy provided by applicable law[.];
[(3)] (III) [Any provision whereby] REQUIRES the resident [waives his]
TO WAIVE THE right to a jury trial[.];
[(4)] (IV) [Any provision authorizing] AUTHORIZES the park owner to
take possession of the leased premises, or the resident’s personal property therein unless
the rental agreement has been terminated by action of the parties or by operation of law,
and such personal property has been abandoned by the mobile home resident without the
benefit of formal legal process;
(V) A COURT HAS PREVIOUSLY DETERMINED TO BE
UNCONSCIONABLE OR AGAINST PUBLIC POLICY AND VOID IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
8A–1502 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(VI) REQUIRES AN AWARD OF ATTORNEY’S FEES OR COSTS
WITHOUT A FINDING BY THE COURT THAT THE AWARD IS REASONABLE.
(2) A PROVISION OF A RENTAL AGREEMENT THAT VIOLATES
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE.
[(f)] (G) (1) Any rental agreement offered under this section shall [contain]:
– 13 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) NOTIFY THE RESIDENT IF APPROVAL FROM THE PARK
OWNER IS REQUIRED BEFORE THE RESIDENT MAY SUBLEASE THE PREMISES; AND
(II) CONTAIN the same terms, including rent, fees, and conditions,
as a rental agreement offered to a resident or prospective resident on a month–to–month
term.
(2) (I) IF A PARK OWNER REQUIRES APPROVAL OF A SUBLEASE
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PARK OWNER SHALL PROMPTLY
PROVIDE A REQUESTING RESIDENT WITH WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE APPROVAL OR
DENIAL.
(II) A PARK OWNER MAY NOT UNREASONABLY WITHHOLD
APPROVAL UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
(III) IF A PARK OWNER ACCEPTS RENT FROM A SUBTENANT OR
HAS PREVIOUSLY APPROVED A SPECIFIC SUBTENANT, THERE IS A REBUTTABLE
PRESUMPTION THAT THE PARK OWNER APPROVES THE SUBLEASE.
(3) A RESIDENT MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO OBTAIN APPROVAL FROM
THE PARK OWNER TO SUBLEASE THE PREMISES IF THE RENTAL AGREEMENT DOES
NOT PROVIDE THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
[(g)] (H) (1) Within 30 days after obtaining ownership of a mobile home, a
resident as defined under § 8A–101(j)(2) of this title shall:
(i) Offer the mobile home for sale;
(ii) Apply to the park owner to enter into a rental agreement; or
(iii) Take reasonable steps to remove the mobile home from the park.
(2) A park owner may not unreasonably deny an application submitted
under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a resident as defined under
§ 8A–101(j)(2) of this title shall remove the resident’s mobile home from the park:
(i) If settlement on a sale offered under paragraph (1)(i) of this
subsection has not occurred within 1 year of the resident’s obtaining ownership; or
(ii) Within 6 months after an application submitted under
paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection is denied.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
[(h)] (I) A park owner that enters into a contract of sale for a mobile home park
shall, not less than 30 days before the date of the sale:
(1) Provide notice of the sale to:
(i) Each resident in the mobile home park by hand delivery or
certified mail, return receipt requested; and
(ii) The Department of Housing and Community Development by
certified mail, return receipt requested; and
(2) Post notice of the sale in a public area of the mobile home park.
[(i) (1) This subsection applies only to a rental agreement that has a term of
not less than 1 year that is offered for renewal for a term of not less than 1 year.
(2) If a park owner intends to offer the renewal of a lease agreement with
an increase in rent, the park owner shall provide notice to the resident of the rent increase
no later than 60 days before the expiration of the existing rental agreement.]
(J) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A RENT INCREASE FOR ANY
RESIDENT.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A PARK
OWNER SHALL PROVIDE A RESIDENT WITH WRITTEN NOTICE AT LEAST 90 DAYS
BEFORE THE DATE OF THE RENT INCREASE.
(3) A RENT INCREASE MAY TAKE EFFECT ONLY AFTER THE
EXPIRATION OF AN EXISTING TERM.
(K) IF IN ANY PROCEEDING A COURT DETERMINES THAT A PARK OWNER
VIOLATED A PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, THE RESIDENT MAY RECOVER:
(1) DAMAGES NOT MORE THAN THREE TIMES THE MONTHLY RENT
PAID BY THE RESIDENT;
(2) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS; AND
(3) ANY OTHER REMEDY THE COURT MAY FIND REASONABLE.
8A–301.
– 15 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) A park owner shall establish reasonable rules related to the order,
peace, health, safety, and qualification standards of mobile homes, residents, and the
operation of the park.
(2) A rule established under paragraph (1) of this subsection may not be
enforced unless it is in writing and is delivered to each resident in the park.
(3) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND SUBJECT TO THE
PROHIBITION ON PET FEES UNDER § 8A–402 OF THIS TITLE, A PARK OWNER SHALL
ESTABLISH A PET POLICY FOR THE RESIDENTS OF THE PARK THAT STATES:
(I) ANY BREED AND WEIGHT RESTRICTIONS;
(II) ANY LIMIT ON THE NUMBER OF PETS ALLOWED IN A MOBILE
HOME;
(III) ANY VACCINATION REQUIREMENTS;
(IV) ANY LIABILITY INSURANCE REQUIREMENTS; AND
(V) ANY ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS FOR PET OWNERS
IMPOSED BY THE PARK OWNER.
(b) (1) A park owner shall prescribe reasonable, written standards for the
mobile homes to be placed or retained in the park, their size, quality, appearance, material
specification, construction and safety condition.
(2) A rule adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection setting a
standard for the size, quality, material specification, or construction of mobile homes may
not be enforced against any individual:
(i) Who, at the time the standard is adopted, is the owner or tenant
of a mobile home in the park, as to that mobile home; or
(ii) Who purchases a mobile home from the individual who owned
the home at the time the standard was adopted.
(c) A park owner shall prescribe reasonable, written maintenance standards for
any mobile home in the park or immediate area surrounding the mobile home, in
accordance with the State or county health laws or regulations.
(d) All rules and standards shall be fair and reasonable and, except as provided
in paragraph (b)(2) of this section, shall apply uniformly to all residents in the park.
(e) A rule or standard is not enforceable unless the park owner:
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
(1) Delivers a copy of the rule or standard to each resident affected thereby;
and
(2) Posts a copy of the rule or standard in a conspicuous place in the park.
(f) An amendment to a rule or standard is not effective until the later of:
(1) The date specified in the amendment; or
(2) 30 days after the park owner delivers to each resident written notice of
the proposed amendment.
8A–401.
(a) A park owner may increase a park fee only if the park owner delivers to each
resident a notice in writing of the increase at least 30 days before the effective date of the
increased park fee.
(b) If a park owner fails to so notify a resident affected by the increase, the park
owner may not collect the increased amount of the park fee from the resident.
(C) (1) A PARK OWNER SHALL PROVIDE A RESIDENT WITH WRITTEN
NOTICE AT LEAST 30 DAYS BEFORE REQUIRING THE PAYMENT OF A FEE.
(2) IF A FEE IS OVERDUE, A PARK OWNER MAY NOT RECEIVE
INTEREST OR IMPOSE A LATE PAYMENT FEE.
(D) (1) A PARK OWNER MAY NOT IMPOSE A FEE THAT IS UNREASONABLE.
(2) THERE IS A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT A FEE IS
UNREASONABLE IF THE FEE EXCEEDS 3% OF THE EQUIVALENT OF 1 MONTH’S RENT
FOR THE RESIDENT.
(E) IF IN ANY PROCEEDING A COURT DETERMINES THAT A PARK OWNER
VIOLATED A PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, THE RESIDENT MAY RECOVER:
(1) DAMAGES NOT MORE THAN THREE TIMES THE MONTHLY RENT
PAID BY THE RESIDENT;
(2) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS; AND
(3) ANY OTHER REMEDY THE COURT MAY FIND REASONABLE.
8A–402.
– 17 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) An entrance or exit fee is prohibited.
(b) A fee may not be charged:
(1) In connection with the renewal of a rental agreement; [or]
(2) To determine if a resident is qualified under [§ 8A–202(c)] § 8A–202(B)
of this title;
(3) FOR PARKING ON THE PREMISES OF THE RESIDENT;
(4) FOR KEEPING A PET ON THE PREMISES OF THE RESIDENT;
(5) FOR THE USE OF ANY PARK AMENITIES, SUCH AS A SWIMMING
POOL OR A GYMNASIUM;
(6) FOR ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS THAT ARE NOT EXPRESSLY
AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS TITLE;
(7) FOR THE INSTALLATION, PLACEMENT, OR REMOVAL OF A MOBILE
HOME FROM THE PREMISES; OR
(8) FOR A UTILITY CONNECTION ON THE PREMISES OF THE
RESIDENT.
(c) Except if a material change results in the deterioration of the home, a park
owner may not charge a fee for inspecting a home for resale more than one time within a
12–month period.
(d) The fee for inspecting a home for resale may not exceed $60.
(E) (1) IF A VIOLATION OF A PARK RULE CAUSES ACTUAL DAMAGES, A
PARK OWNER MAY IMPOSE A FEE IN AN AMOUNT NOT TO EXCEED THE COSTS
INCURRED BY THE VIOLATION.
(2) ON REQUEST, A PARK OWNER SHALL PROVIDE A RESIDENT WITH
ADEQUATE DOCUMENTATION TO SUPPORT THE ASSESSMENT AND THE AMOUNT OF
THE FEE.
(F) A RESIDENT MAY DISPUTE THE IMPOSITION OF A FEE IN A
REPOSSESSION PROCEEDING UNDER SUBTITLE 17 OF THIS TITLE.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
[8A–403.
(a) A park owner may charge the resident a reasonable service fee, based on an
amount that the park owner directly incurs, for installing, placing on, or removing a mobile
home from the site.
(b) In each case where a fee has been charged by a park owner, a written
description detailing the fee shall be provided by the park owner to the resident.]
8A–501.
(A) A park owner may not:
(1) Require, as a condition of tenancy, the purchase of any permanent
improvement that would become the property of the park owner;
(2) Require any current resident or prospective resident to purchase from
any particular person a mobile home, materials, or equipment, including the equipment
required by the applicable law, necessary for installation of the mobile home, except in
connection with the initial leasing or renting of a newly–constructed lot not previously
leased or rented to any other person;
(3) Restrict the supplier of any product or service that the park owner does
not supply to all residents in the park, except as the restriction directly relates to the safety
of the residents;
(4) Restrict the installation, service, or maintenance of any electric or gas
appliance if the installation complies with the applicable building code and other laws;
(5) Restrict any interior improvement of a mobile home if the improvement
complies with the applicable code and other laws;
(6) Directly or indirectly, receive, collect, or accept any gratuity from any
person that is made to facilitate, influence, or procure any advantage over other prospective
residents in connection with the lease, use, or occupation of the premises; [or]
(7) PROHIBIT A RESIDENT FROM MAKING SEPARATE PAYMENTS TO A
PARK OWNER FOR RENT, UTILITIES, OR A FEE;
(8) EXCEPT AS AUTHORIZED UNDER § 8A–202(G)(2) OF THIS TITLE,
PROHIBIT A RESIDENT FROM SUBLEASING THE PREMISES; OR
[(7) (i)] (9) Enforce the designation of an area in a park for exclusive
occupancy by adults against any individual who, at the time the designation is made, is the
owner or tenant of a mobile home in the park, as to that mobile home at its location at the
time of the designation.
– 19 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(ii)] (B) [Subparagraph (i) of this paragraph] SUBSECTION (A)(9)
OF THIS SECTION does not apply if only a part of the park is so designated, and
[1.] (1) The park owner:
[A.] (I) Has made available to the individual, under
comparable terms and conditions, another reasonably equivalent site for the mobile home
in an area of the park that is not so designated and the individual shall accept or reject the
proposed site within 60 days from the time the equivalent site is made available; and
[B.] (II) Has assumed the responsibility of moving the
mobile home at the park owner’s expense; or
[2.] (2) The mobile home is not moved.
8A–503.
(A) A park owner who purchases from a [publicly regulated] utility VENDOR any
[electricity, gas, or other] utility service for resale to a resident may not charge directly or
indirectly for the resale an amount that exceeds the amount that the utility charges the
park owner.
(B) A PARK OWNER MAY NOT IMPOSE A FEE ON A UTILITY SERVICE THAT IS
PROVIDED TO A RESIDENT BY A UTILITY VENDOR, SUCH AS AN ADMINISTRATIVE FEE
OR A MAINTENANCE FEE.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION, IF A
UTILITY SERVICE FOR A RESIDENT IS DELIVERED THROUGH A MASTER METER, THE
PARK OWNER SHALL DIVIDE EQUALLY THE COST FOR THE SERVICE AMONG THE
RESIDENTS THAT RECEIVE THE SERVICE.
(D) (1) (I) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A UTILITY VENDOR THAT
PROVIDES WELL WATER SERVICE TO A RESIDENT.
(II) A UTILITY VENDOR MAY NOT BILL A RESIDENT FOR WELL
WATER SERVICE IN AN AMOUNT THAT EXCEEDS 5% OF THE RENT PAYABLE BY THE
RESIDENT FOR THE TIME PERIOD COVERED BY THE BILL.
(III) THE AMOUNT FOR THE WELL WATER SERVICE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL INCLUDE ANY FEE IMPOSED FOR
THE USE OF THE SERVICE, SUCH AS A MAINTENANCE, TRANSMISSION, TREATMENT,
OR INFRASTRUCTURE FEE.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
(IV) THE PROHIBITION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH APPLIES REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE WELL WATER SERVICE IS
DELIVERED THROUGH A SINGLE METER OF A RESIDENT OR A MASTER METER.
(2) (I) A UTILITY VENDOR SUBJECT TO THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
PROVIDE A RESIDENT WITH A UTILITY BILL BEFORE REQUIRING PAYMENT FOR ANY
WELL WATER SERVICE.
(II) A UTILITY BILL UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN STATEMENT EXPLAINING:
1. EACH CHARGE IMPOSED;
2. THE COST OF THE WELL WATER SERVICE;
3. ANY FEES IMPOSED AND THE BASIS FOR THE FEES;
AND
4. THE METHOD USED TO DETERMINE THE COST OF THE
SERVICE.
(3) ON REQUEST OF A RESIDENT, A UTILITY VENDOR SHALL ALLOW
THE RESIDENT TO INSPECT RECORDS RETAINED BY THE UTILITY VENDOR THAT
DOCUMENT A BILL FOR WELL WATER SERVICE.
8A–604.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A RESIDENT AGAINST WHOM AN
ACTION FOR REPOSSESSION IS PENDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBTITLE 17 OF
THIS TITLE.
(B) A resident shall provide the park owner with a 30–day prior written notice of
the resident’s intention to sell the mobile home which will be removed from the site or
retained on the site after resale, subject to the provisions of this title.
8A–801.
(a) The park owner at all times shall:
(1) Comply with all applicable building, housing, zoning, and health codes;
(2) Keep in good repair the leased site and all permanent fixtures that the
park owner provides;
– 21 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Keep in a good state of appearance, repair, safety, and cleanliness the
common areas and buildings;
(4) Provide at all reasonable times for the benefit of residents access to
common areas, including their buildings and improvements, which access may not infringe
on the leased site of any resident; [and]
(5) Keep in good repair each utility service; AND
(6) BE AVAILABLE OR HAVE A DESIGNATED CONTACT AVAILABLE FOR
A RESIDENT TO REPORT AN EMERGENCY.
(b) (1) A park owner or an operator of a mobile home park, or the agent or
employee of a park owner or an operator of a mobile home park, may not refuse, withhold
from, or deny to any person any of the accommodations, advantages, facilities, or privileges
of the mobile home park or leases to the premises because of [the]:
(I) THE NONPAYMENT OF RENT OF A RESIDENT; OR
(II) THE race, creed, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity,
[or] DISABILITY, RELIGION, SOURCE OF INCOME, FAMILIAL STATUS, MARITAL
STATUS, MILITARY STATUS, OR national origin of that person.
(2) A RESIDENT AGGRIEVED BY A VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (1)(II)
OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 20–1035
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE TO OBTAIN APPROPRIATE RELIEF FOR AN
ALLEGED DISCRIMINATORY HOUSING PRACTICE.
(C) (1) A PARK OWNER SHALL ENSURE THAT EACH RESIDENT HAS
ACCESS TO A WATER SUPPLY THAT COMPLIES WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND
STATE PRIMARY AND SECONDARY DRINKING WATER REGULATIONS.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES TO A PARK WHERE RESIDENTS
RECEIVE WATER FROM A SUPPLIER OF WATER, AS DEFINED IN § 9–401 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(II) IF A PARK OWNER RECEIVES A CONSUMER WATER REPORT
FROM A SUPPLIER OF WATER AS THE CUSTOMER OF RECORD, THE PARK OWNER
SHALL PROVIDE EACH RESIDENT WITH A COPY OF THE REPORT.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
(3) IF THE SUPPLY OF WATER TO A RESIDENT IS DISRUPTED FOR
MORE THAN 4 HOURS IN A 24–HOUR PERIOD, THE PARK OWNER SHALL PROVIDE THE
RESIDENT WITH AT LEAST 4 LITERS OF POTABLE WATER.
(D) (1) DURING NORMAL BUSINESS HOURS, A PARK OWNER SHALL BE
AVAILABLE FOR RESIDENTS TO CONTACT BY TELEPHONE AND E–MAIL REGARDING
COMPLAINTS, MAINTENANCE REQUESTS, AND OTHER PARK BUSINESS.
(2) A PARK OWNER SHALL PROVIDE EACH RESIDENT WITH
EMERGENCY CONTACT INFORMATION.
8A–1001.
(a) (1) (I) A park owner may not impose a security deposit in excess of the
equivalent of [2] 1 months’ rent, or [$50] $500, whichever is greater.
(II) If a security deposit exceeds [this] THE amount AUTHORIZED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, the resident may recover DAMAGES
up to [threefold] THREE TIMES the extra money charged, plus reasonable attorney’s fees.
8A–1101.
[(a)] A park owner may only evict a resident for:
(1) Nonpayment of rent; or
(2) The following violations:
(i) Making or causing to be made, with knowledge, any
MATERIALLY false or misleading statement on an application for tenancy;
(ii) [Violation] A VIOLATION of a federal, State, or local law that [is
detrimental to] ENDANGERS the safety and welfare of other residents in the park; [or]
(iii) [Repeated] A SUBSTANTIAL violation of any rule or provision of
the rental agreement [occurring within a] WITHIN THE 6–month period IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING THE COMMENCEMENT OF THE EVICTION ACTION; OR
(IV) SUBLEASING THE PREMISES AFTER THE PARK OWNER
DENIES THE REQUEST OF THE RESIDENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8A–202(G)(2) OF
THIS TITLE.
[(b) A park owner shall deliver to the resident by certified mail, regular mail, or
personal delivery a written notice of the violation at least 30 days before the date the
– 23 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
resident is required to vacate the premises. The notice shall be specifically addressed to the
resident in question and shall provide a specific reason for the eviction.]
8A–1301.
(a) (1) For any reason listed in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a park owner
may not:
(i) Bring or threaten to bring an action for possession against a
resident;
(ii) Arbitrarily increase the rent or decrease the services to which a
resident has been entitled; [or]
(iii) INCONSISTENTLY OR ARBITRARILY ENFORCE A PROVISION
OF THE RENTAL AGREEMENT OR PARK RULES AGAINST A RESIDENT; OR
(IV) Terminate a periodic tenancy.
(2) A park owner may not take an action that is listed under paragraph (1)
of this subsection for any of the following reasons:
(i) Because the resident or the resident’s agent has provided written
or actual notice of a good faith complaint about an alleged violation of the rental agreement,
violation of law, or condition on the leased premises that is a substantial threat to the
health or safety of occupants to:
1. The park owner; or
2. Any public agency against the park owner;
(ii) Because the resident or the resident’s agent has:
1. Filed a lawsuit against the park owner; or
2. Testified or participated in a lawsuit involving the park
owner; or
(iii) Because the resident has participated in any tenant’s
organization.
(b) (1) A park owner’s violation of subsection (a) of this section is a “retaliatory
action”.
(2) A resident may raise a retaliatory action of a park owner:
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
(i) In defense to an action for possession; or
(ii) As an affirmative claim for damages resulting from a retaliatory
action of a park owner occurring during a tenancy.
(c) If in any proceeding the court finds in favor of the resident because the park
owner engaged in a retaliatory action, the court may enter judgment against the park
owner for damages not [to exceed] MORE THAN the equivalent of [3 months’] SIX TIMES
THE MONTHLY rent, reasonable attorney’s fees, and court costs.
(d) An action by a park owner may not be deemed to be retaliatory for purposes
of this section if the alleged retaliatory action occurs more than 6 months after a resident’s
action that is protected under subsection (a)(2) of this section.
(e) As long as a park owner’s termination of a tenancy is not the result of a
retaliatory action, nothing in this section may be interpreted to alter the park owner’s or
the resident’s rights arising from breach of any provision of a rental agreement or rule, or
either party’s right to terminate or not renew a rental agreement pursuant to the terms of
the rental agreement or the provisions of other applicable law.
(f) If any county has enacted or enacts an ordinance comparable in subject matter
to this section, this section shall supersede the provisions of the ordinance to the extent
that the ordinance provides less protection to a resident.
8A–1502.
(a) If it is claimed or appears to the court that a rental agreement or park rule
may be unconscionable, the court may give to the parties a reasonable opportunity to
present evidence as to the meaning of the rental agreement or park rule, relationship of the
parties, purpose, and other relevant factors to aid the court in making a determination.
(b) [A park rule that does not apply uniformly to all residents in a park creates
a] THERE IS A rebuttable presumption [of unfairness] THAT A PROVISION OF THE PARK
RULES IS UNCONSCIONABLE IF THE PROVISION IS:
(1) NOT APPLIED UNIFORMLY TO ALL RESIDENTS; OR
(2) ENFORCED INCONSISTENTLY OR ARBITRARILY BY THE PARK
OWNER.
(c) In determining if a provision of a rental agreement or of a park rule is
unconscionable, the court may consider if the provision:
(1) Promotes the convenience, safety, or welfare of residents;
(2) Preserves from abusive use property of the park owner;
– 25 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Promotes a fair distribution of services or facilities held out to residents
generally;
(4) Relates reasonably to its purpose;
(5) Applies to all residents in a fair manner;
(6) Is sufficiently explicit for a resident to comply; and
(7) Is for the purpose of evading an obligation of the park owner.
(d) If a court finds that any provision of a rental agreement or park rule is
unconscionable, the court may:
(1) Refuse to enforce the rental agreement or park rule;
(2) Enforce the remainder of the rental agreement or park rule without the
unconscionable provision; or
(3) Limit the application of any unconscionable provision as to avoid any
unconscionable result.
(e) (1) If the effect of any provision of a rental agreement is to indemnify the
park owner, hold [him] THE PARK OWNER harmless, or preclude or exonerate [him] THE
PARK OWNER from any liability to a mobile home resident, or to any other person, for any
injury, loss, damage, or liability arising from any omission, fault, negligence, or other
misconduct of the park owner on or about the leased premises not within the exclusive
control of the mobile home resident, the provision is against public policy and void.
(2) An insurer may not claim a right of subrogation by reason of the
invalidity of this provision.
8A–1701.
(A) (1) BEFORE A PARK OWNER MAY FILE A COMPLAINT FOR
REPOSSESSION OF THE PREMISES UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE PARK OWNER SHALL
PROVIDE THE RESIDENT AND ANY KNOWN SUBTENANT WITH WRITTEN NOTICE OF
THE PARK OWNER’S INTENT TO FILE THE COMPLAINT.
(2) THE PARK OWNER SHALL PROVIDE THE NOTICE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) AT LEAST 30 DAYS BEFORE FILING A COMPLAINT UNDER §
8A–1702 OR § 8A–1704 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
(II) AT LEAST 90 DAYS BEFORE FILING A COMPLAINT UNDER §
8A–1703 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) THE NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) BE SENT BY FIRST–CLASS MAIL WITH CERTIFICATE OF
MAILING;
(II) BE ADDRESSED TO THE RESIDENT AND, IF APPLICABLE,
THE SUBTENANT;
(III) STATE THE TYPE OF COMPLAINT THAT THE PARK OWNER
INTENDS TO FILE AND THE BASIS FOR THE COMPLAINT; AND
(IV) BE PROVIDED IN A FORM DEVELOPED BY THE MARYLAND
JUDICIARY.
(B) IF A RESIDENT RECEIVES A NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION THAT ALLEGES THE NONPAYMENT OF RENT, THE RESIDENT SHALL HAVE
10 DAYS FROM THE DATE THE RESIDENT RECEIVES THE NOTICE TO CURE THE
NONPAYMENT BEFORE THE PARK OWNER MAY FILE A COMPLAINT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 8A–1702 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) A PARK OWNER SHALL JOIN ANY KNOWN SUBTENANT OF THE
RESIDENT AS A DEFENDANT IN AN ACTION FOR REPOSSESSION OF THE PREMISES
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A PARK OWNER MAY NOT REPOSSESS THE PREMISES FROM A
SUBTENANT UNLESS A VIOLATION HAS BEEN COMMITTED UNDER § 8A–1101 OR §
8A–1103 OF THIS TITLE.
(D) THE NOTICE REQUIREMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION APPLIES REGARDLESS OF THE TERM OF THE TENANCY.
(E) A PARK OWNER MAY NOT FILE A COMPLAINT AGAINST A RESIDENT OR
SUBTENANT FOR REPOSSESSION OF THE PREMISES UNDER TITLE 8, SUBTITLE 4 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
[8A–1701.] 8A–1702.
– 27 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) Whenever the resident under any rental agreement, express or implied, verbal
or written, shall fail to pay the rent when due and payable, it shall be lawful for the park
owner to have again and repossess the premises so rented.
(b) (1) Whenever any park owner shall desire to repossess any premises to
which [he] THE PARK OWNER is entitled, [he or his] THE PARK OWNER OR THE duly
qualified agent or attorney OF THE PARK OWNER, shall make [his] A written complaint
under oath or affirmation, before the District Court of the county wherein the property is
situated, describing in general terms the property sought to be repossessed, and also setting
forth the name of the resident to whom the property is rented or [his] THE assignee or THE
subtenant with the amount of rent due and unpaid[;] and praying by warrant to repossess
the premises, together with judgment for the amount of rent due and costs.
(2) The District Court shall issue its summons, directed to any constable or
sheriff of the county entitled to serve process, and ordering [him] THE CONSTABLE OR
SHERIFF to notify by first–class mail the tenant, assignee, or subtenant to appear before
the District Court at the trial to be held on the fifth day after the filing of the complaint, to
answer the park owner’s complaint to show cause why the prayer of the park owner should
not be granted, and the constable or sheriff shall proceed to serve the summons [upon] ON
the resident, assignee, or subtenant in the property or [upon his ] THE known or authorized
agent OF THE RESIDENT, ASSIGNEE, OR SUBTENANT, but if for any reason, neither the
resident, assignee, [or] subtenant, nor [his] AN agent, can be found, then the constable or
sheriff shall affix an attested copy of the summons conspicuously [upon] ON the mobile
home.
(3) The affixing of the summons [upon] ON the mobile home after due
notification to the resident, assignee, or subtenant by first–class mail shall conclusively be
presumed to be a sufficient service to all persons to support the entry of a default judgment
for possession of the premises, together with court costs, in favor of the park owner, but it
[shall] MAY not be sufficient service to support a default judgment in favor of the park
owner for the amount of rent due.
(c) (1) If, at the trial on the fifth day indicated in subsection (b) of this section,
the court is satisfied that the interests of justice will be better served by an adjournment to
enable either party to procure [his] necessary witnesses[, he may] OR EVIDENCE, OR FOR
THE RESIDENT TO ACCESS LEGAL REPRESENTATION UNDER TITLE 8, SUBTITLE 9
OF THIS ARTICLE, THE COURT SHALL adjourn the trial for a REASONABLE period [not
exceeding 1 day, except that if the consent of all parties is obtained, the trial may be
adjourned for a longer period of time] OR A PERIOD DETERMINED BY THE PARTIES.
(2) If, when the trial occurs, it appears to the satisfaction of the court, that
the rent, or any part of the rent, is actually due and unpaid, the court shall determine the
amount of rent due and enter a judgment in favor of the park owner for possession of the
premises. The court may also give judgment in favor of the park owner for the amount of
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
rent determined to be due together with costs of the suit if the court finds that the actual
service of process made on the defendant would have been sufficient to support a judgment
in an action in contract or tort.
(3) The court, when entering the judgment, shall also order the resident to
yield and render possession of the premises to the park owner, or [his] THE agent or
attorney OF THE PARK OWNER, within 30 days after the trial.
(4) The court may, [upon] ON presentation of a certificate signed by a
physician certifying that surrender of the premises within this 30–day period would
endanger the health or life of the resident or any other occupant of the premises, extend
the time for surrender of the premises as justice may require. However, the court may not
extend the time for the surrender of the premises beyond 45 days after the trial.
(5) However, if the resident[, or someone for him,] at the trial, or
adjournment of the trial, tenders to the park owner the rent determined by the court to be
due and unpaid, together with the costs of the suit, the complaint against the resident shall
be entered as being satisfied.
(d) (1) [If] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF
judgment is given in favor of the park owner, and the resident fails to comply with the
requirements of the order within 15 days, the court shall, at any time after the expiration
of the 15 days, issue its warrant, directed to any official of the county entitled to serve
process, ordering [him] THE OFFICIAL to cause the park owner to have again and repossess
the property by putting [him (or his] THE PARK OWNER, OR THE duly qualified agent or
attorney [for his benefit)] OF THE PARK OWNER, in possession [thereof, and for that
purpose to remove from the property, by force if necessary, the mobile home and all
additions or attachments of every description whatsoever belonging to the resident, or to
any person claiming or holding by or under said resident].
(2) If the park owner does not order a warrant of restitution within 60 days
from the date of judgment or from the expiration date of any stay of execution, whichever
shall be the later, the judgment for possession shall be stricken.
(3) A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE EXECUTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF § 8A–1706 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(e) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, in any action of summary
ejectment for failure to pay rent where the park owner is awarded a judgment giving the
park owner restitution of the leased premises, the resident shall have the right to
redemption of the leased premises by tendering in cash, certified check, or money order to
the park owner or the park owner’s agent all past due rent and late fees, plus all court
awarded costs and fees, at any time before actual execution of the eviction order.
– 29 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) An electronic or written check issued by a political subdivision or on
behalf of a governmental entity shall have the same legal effect as a payment made by the
resident under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) This subsection does not apply to any resident against whom three
judgments of possession have been entered for rent due and unpaid in the 12 months prior
to the initiation of the action to which this subsection otherwise would apply.
(f) The resident or the park owner may appeal from the judgment of the District
Court to the circuit court for any county at any time within [2] 15 days from the rendition
of the judgment. The resident, in order to stay any execution of the judgment, shall give a
bond [to the park owner with one or more sureties, who are owners of sufficient property
in the State of Maryland] AND PAY RENT INTO ESCROW IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
8A–1705 OF THIS SUBTITLE, with condition to prosecute the appeal with effect[, and
answer to the park owner in all costs and damages mentioned in the judgment, and such
other damages as shall be incurred and sustained by reason of the appeal. The bond shall
not affect in any manner the right of the park owner to proceed against the resident,
assignee, or subtenant for any and all rents that may become due and payable to the park
owner after the rendition of the judgment].
[8A–1702.] 8A–1703.
(a) (1) A resident under any lease or someone holding under [him] THE
RESIDENT, who shall unlawfully hold over beyond the termination of the rental agreement,
shall be liable to the park owner for the actual damages caused by the holding over.
(2) The damages awarded to a park owner against the resident or someone
holding under [him] THE RESIDENT, may not be less than the apportioned rent for the
period of holdover at the rate under the rental agreement.
(3) Any action to recover damages under this section may be brought by
suit separate from the eviction or removal proceeding or in the same action and in any court
having jurisdiction over the amount in issue.
(4) Nothing contained herein is intended to limit any other remedies which
a park owner may have against a holdover resident under the rental agreement or under
applicable law.
(b) (1) Where any interest in property shall be leased for any definite term or
at will, and the park owner shall desire to repossess the property after the expiration of the
term for which it was leased and shall give notice in [writing 1 month] ACCORDANCE
WITH § 8A–1701 OF THIS SUBTITLE before the expiration of the term or determination of
the will to the resident or to the person actually in possession of the property to remove
from the property at the end of the term, and if the resident or person in actual possession
shall refuse to comply, the park owner may make complaint in writing to the District Court
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
of the county where the property is located. The court shall issue its summons to the
resident or person in possession that [he] THE RESIDENT OR PERSON IN POSSESSION
appear on a day stated in the summons before the court to show cause [(if any he have)],
IF ANY, why restitution of the possession of the estate leased should not be made to the
park owner. [Upon] ON the failure of either of the parties to appear before the court on the
day stated in the summons, the court may continue the case to a day not less than 6 [nor]
DAYS OR more than 10 days after the day first stated and notify the parties of the
continuance.
(2) If [upon] ON hearing the parties, or in case the resident or person in
possession shall neglect to appear after the summons and continuance the court shall find
that the park owner had been in possession of the leased property, that the said lease or
estate is fully ended and expired, that due notice to quit as aforesaid had been given to the
resident or person in possession and that [he] THE RESIDENT OR PERSON IN
POSSESSION had refused so to do, the court shall [thereupon] give judgment for the
restitution of the possession of said premises and shall forthwith issue its warrant to the
sheriff or a constable in the respective counties commanding [him] THE SHERIFF OR
CONSTABLE forthwith to deliver to the park owner possession thereof in as full and ample
manner as the park owner was possessed of the same at the time when the leasing was
made, and shall give judgment for costs against the resident or person in possession so
holding over.
(3) (I) Either party shall have the right to appeal therefrom to the
circuit court for the county within [ten] 10 days from the judgment. [If the resident appeals
and files with the District Court an affidavit that the appeal is not taken for delay, and also
a good and sufficient bond with one or more securities conditioned that he will prosecute
the appeal with effect and well and truly pay all rent in arrears and all costs in the case
before the District Court and in the appellate court and all loss or damage which the park
owner may suffer by reason of the resident’s holding over, including the value of the
premises during the time he shall so hold over, then the resident or person in possession of
said premises may retain possession thereof until the determination of said appeal.]
(II) TO STAY EXECUTION OF THE JUDGMENT ON APPEAL, THE
RESIDENT OR PERSON IN POSSESSION SHALL:
1. COMPLY WITH THE BOND AND ESCROW
REQUIREMENTS OF § 8A–1705 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
2. PAY ALL LOSSES OR DAMAGES THAT THE PARK
OWNER MAY SUFFER FROM THE HOLDOVER.
(III) The appellate court shall, [upon] ON application of either party,
set a day for the hearing of the appeal, not less than 5 [nor] DAYS OR more than 15 days
after the application, and notice for the order for a hearing shall be served on the opposite
– 31 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
party [or his counsel] at least 5 days before the hearing. If the judgment of the District
Court shall be in favor of the park owner, a warrant shall be issued by the appellate court
to the sheriff, who shall proceed forthwith to execute the warrant.
[(3) The provisions of this section shall apply to all cases of tenancies from
year to year, tenancies of the month and by the week. In case of tenancies from year to year,
notice in writing shall be given 3 months before the expiration of the current year of the
tenancy, and in monthly or weekly tenancies, a notice in writing of 1 month, shall be so
given; and the same proceeding shall apply, so far as may be, to cases of forcible entry and
detainer.
(4) When the resident shall give notice by parole to the park owner or to
his agent or representatives, at least 1 month before the expiration of the lease or tenancy
in all cases except in cases of tenancies from year to year, and at least 3 months’ notice in
all cases of tenancy from year to year, of the intention of the tenant to remove at the end of
that year and to surrender possession of the property at that time, and the park owner, his
agent, or representative shall prove the notice from the resident by competent testimony,
it shall not be necessary for the park owner, his agent or representative to provide a written
notice to the resident, but the proof of such notice from the resident as aforesaid shall entitle
the park owner to recover possession of the property hereunder.]
(C) A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE EXECUTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF §
8A–1706 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) IF THE PARK OWNER DOES NOT ORDER A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION
WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF JUDGMENT OR AFTER THE EXPIRATION DATE
OF ANY STAY OF EXECUTION, WHICHEVER IS LATER, THE JUDGMENT FOR
POSSESSION SHALL BE STRICKEN.
[8A–1703.] 8A–1704.
(a) (1) [When a rental agreement provides that the] THE park owner may
FILE A COMPLAINT TO repossess the premises if [the]:
(I) THE resident breaches the rental agreement[, and the] AS
DESCRIBED UNDER § 8A–1101(2)(III) OF THIS TITLE;
(II) THE park owner has given the resident [1 month’s] written
notice IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8A–1701 OF THIS SUBTITLE that the resident is in
violation of the rental agreement and the park owner desires to repossess the premises[,
and if the]; AND
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
(III) THE resident or person in actual possession refuses to comply[,
the park owner may make complaint in writing to the District Court of the county where
the premises is located].
(2) THE PARK OWNER SHALL FILE THE COMPLAINT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IN WRITING WITH THE DISTRICT COURT IN
THE COUNTY WHERE THE PREMISES ARE LOCATED.
(3) The court shall summons immediately the resident or person in
possession to appear before the court on a day stated in the summons to show cause, if any,
why restitution of the possession of the leased premises should not be made to the park
owner.
(4) If either of the parties fails to appear before the court on the day stated
in the summons, the court may continue the case for not less than 6 [nor] DAYS OR more
than 10 days and notify the parties of the continuance.
(b) (1) If the court determines that the resident breached the terms of the
rental agreement and that the breach warrants an eviction, the court shall give judgment
for the restitution of the possession of the premises and issue its warrant to the sheriff or
a constable commanding [him] THE SHERIFF OR CONSTABLE to deliver possession to the
park owner in as full and ample manner as the park owner was possessed of the same at
the time when the rental agreement was entered into. The court shall give judgment for
costs against the resident or person in possession.
(2) (I) Either party may appeal to the circuit court for the county within
10 days from entry of the judgment. [If the resident (1) files with the District Court an
affidavit that the appeal is not taken for delay; (2) files sufficient bond with one or more
securities conditioned upon diligent prosecution of the appeal; (3) pays all rent in arrears,
all court costs in the case; and (4) pays all losses or damages which the park owner may
suffer by reason of the resident’s holding over, the resident or person in possession of the
premises may retain possession until the determination of the appeal.]
(II) TO STAY EXECUTION OF THE JUDGMENT ON APPEAL, THE
RESIDENT OR PERSON IN POSSESSION SHALL:
1. COMPLY WITH THE BOND AND ESCROW
REQUIREMENTS OF § 8A–1705 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
2. PAY ALL LOSSES OR DAMAGES THAT THE PARK
OWNER MAY SUFFER FROM THE HOLDOVER.
(3) [Upon] ON application of either party, the court shall set a day for the
hearing of the appeal not less than 5 [nor] DAYS OR more than 15 days after the
– 33 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
application, and notice of the order for a hearing shall be served on the other party [or his
counsel] at least 5 days before the hearing. If the judgment of the District Court is in favor
of the park owner, a warrant shall be issued by the court which hears the appeal to the
sheriff, who shall execute the warrant.
(C) A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL BE EXECUTED IN COMPLIANCE WITH § 8A–1706 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) IF THE PARK OWNER DOES NOT ORDER A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION
WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF JUDGMENT OR AFTER THE EXPIRATION DATE
OF ANY STAY OF EXECUTION, WHICHEVER IS LATER, THE JUDGMENT FOR
POSSESSION SHALL BE STRICKEN.
8A–1705.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO AN APPEAL OF A JUDGMENT UNDER §§
8A–1702 THROUGH 8A–1704 OF THIS SUBTITLE TO THE CIRCUIT COURT BY A
RESIDENT OR A PERSON HOLDING UNDER A RESIDENT.
(B) (1) (I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
BOND AMOUNT FOR AN APPEAL UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE DETERMINED BY
THE COURT AND MAY NOT EXCEED THE EQUIVALENT OF 1 MONTH’S RENT.
(II) THE AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE COURT UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT INCLUDE ANY FEES OR RENT DUE
AND UNPAID.
(2) IF AN ATTORNEY FOR A RESIDENT OR A PERSON HOLDING UNDER
THE RESIDENT FILES AN AFFIDAVIT THAT THE APPEAL WAS FILED IN GOOD FAITH
AND WITHOUT INTENT TO DELAY THE PROCEEDING, THE COURT SHALL WAIVE THE
BOND REQUIREMENT IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) (1) (I) ON APPEAL, THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL IMMEDIATELY
ENTER AN ORDER DIRECTING THE RESIDENT OR ANY PERSON HOLDING UNDER THE
RESIDENT TO PAY ALL RENT THAT COMES DUE DURING THE PENDENCY OF THE
ACTION INTO THE REGISTRY OF AN ESCROW ACCOUNT OF:
1. THE CLERK OF THE CIRCUIT COURT;
2. AN ADMINISTRATIVE AGENCY OF THE COUNTY THAT
IS EMPOWERED BY LOCAL LAW TO HOLD RENTS IN ESCROW PENDING
INVESTIGATION AND DISPOSITION OF COMPLAINTS BY RESIDENTS; OR
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
3. THE PARK OWNER.
(II) THE ORDER OF THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL REQUIRE THE
RENT TO BE PAID WHEN DUE UNDER THE RENTAL AGREEMENT AND BEGIN WITH THE
NEXT RENT DUE DATE AFTER THE APPEAL WAS FILED.
(2) (I) IF THE RESIDENT OR ANY PERSON HOLDING UNDER THE
RESIDENT FAILS TO PAY RENT AS IT COMES DUE UNDER THE TERMS OF THE ORDER,
THE CIRCUIT COURT, ON MOTION OF THE PARK OWNER AND CERTIFICATION OF THE
STATUS OF THE DELINQUENT ACCOUNT BY THE CLERK, THE AGENCY, OR THE PARK
OWNER, AS APPLICABLE, SHALL CONDUCT A HEARING WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER
CERTIFICATION OF THE STATUS OF THE DELINQUENT ACCOUNT.
(II) THE ESCROW ORDER OF THE DISTRICT COURT AND THE
CERTIFICATION OF THE CLERK OR AGENCY ARE PRESUMED TO BE VALID.
(III) THE RESIDENT OR PERSON HOLDING UNDER THE RESIDENT
MAY DISPUTE THE VALIDITY OR TERMS OF THE DISTRICT COURT’S ESCROW ORDER
OR RAISE ANY OTHER DEFENSE TO THE ALLEGED NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THE
ORDER.
(IV) IF THE CIRCUIT COURT DETERMINES THAT THE FAILURE TO
PAY IS WITHOUT LEGAL JUSTIFICATION, THE COURT MAY TREAT A RESIDENT’S
DEMAND FOR JURY TRIAL AS WAIVED, AND MAY EITHER IMMEDIATELY CONDUCT A
NONJURY TRIAL OR SET THE MATTER FOR A FUTURE NONJURY TRIAL ON THE
MERITS OF THE PARK OWNER’S CLAIM.
(3) (I) ON FINAL DISPOSITION OF THE ACTION, THE CIRCUIT
COURT SHALL ORDER DISTRIBUTION OF THE RENT ESCROW ACCOUNT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE JUDGMENT.
(II) IF NO JUDGMENT IS ENTERED, THE CIRCUIT COURT SHALL
ORDER DISTRIBUTION TO THE PARTY ENTITLED TO THE RENT ESCROW ACCOUNT
AFTER THE HEARING.
(4) IF A RESIDENT OR A PERSON HOLDING UNDER THE RESIDENT
SATISFIES THE BOND AND ESCROW REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, THE
SATISFACTION SHALL BE A COMPLETE DEFENSE TO AN ACTION BROUGHT BY THE
PARK OWNER FOR RENT THAT BECOMES DUE AND UNPAID AFTER THE JUDGMENT.
8A–1706.
– 35 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) FOLLOWING THE EXECUTION OF A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 8A–1702 THROUGH 8A–1704 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND
SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A RESIDENT SHALL HAVE AT LEAST
30 DAYS BEFORE THE PARK OWNER MAY REPOSSESS THE PREMISES OF A RESIDENT.
(B) DURING THE TIME PERIOD ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION:
(1) THE PARK OWNER SHALL, BETWEEN THE HOURS OF 8:00 A.M. AND
7:00 P.M., GRANT THE RESIDENT ACCESS TO THE PARK AND THE RESIDENT’S MOBILE
HOME FOR THE RESIDENT TO:
(I) RECOVER PERSONAL PROPERTY; AND
(II) MAKE IMPROVEMENTS TO THE MOBILE HOME; AND
(2) THE RESIDENT MAY SELL THE MOBILE HOME TO A THIRD PARTY.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PARK
OWNER SHALL MAKE A WRITTEN OFFER TO THE RESIDENT TO PURCHASE THE
MOBILE HOME AND ANY IMPROVEMENTS WITHIN 20 DAYS AFTER THE EXECUTION OF
A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION.
(2) (I) THE OFFER BY THE PARK OWNER MAY NOT BE LESS THAN
THE APPRAISED VALUE, AS DETERMINED BY A QUALIFIED AND DISINTERESTED
APPRAISER.
(II) THE PARK OWNER SHALL BE RESPONSIBLE FOR OBTAINING
THE APPRAISAL AND THE COST OF THE APPRAISAL.
(III) THE OFFER BY THE PARK OWNER MAY NOT INCLUDE
UNREASONABLE PAYMENT OR FINANCING TERMS.
(3) TO BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE AN OFFER FROM THE PARK OWNER
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE RESIDENT SHALL:
(I) DURING NORMAL BUSINESS HOURS, ALLOW AN APPRAISER
TO INSPECT THE MOBILE HOME FOR THE PURPOSES OF COMPLETING AN APPRAISAL;
AND
(II) RESPOND TO REQUESTS FROM THE APPRAISER FOR
INFORMATION ABOUT THE CONDITION OF THE MOBILE HOME IN A TIMELY MANNER.
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
(4) (I) A RESIDENT SHALL HAVE 10 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF
DELIVERY OF THE OFFER TO ACCEPT THE OFFER.
(II) IF A RESIDENT FAILS TO RESPOND TO AN OFFER FROM THE
PARK OWNER WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE DATE OF DELIVERY OF THE OFFER, THE
OFFER SHALL BE CONSIDERED REJECTED.
(D) (1) A COURT MAY EXTEND THE TIME PERIOD UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION ON A SHOWING OF GOOD CAUSE.
(2) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION OF GOOD CAUSE, THE COURT
SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) PERSONAL HARDSHIP TO THE RESIDENT;
(II) A PENDING SALE OF THE MOBILE HOME OR A LEGITIMATE
DELAY IN THE TRANSFER OF OWNERSHIP; AND
(III) ANY OTHER FACTOR THAT THE COURT CONSIDERS
RELEVANT.
(E) FOLLOWING THE TIME PERIOD ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION AND, IF APPLICABLE, EXTENDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION, A PARK OWNER MAY TAKE POSSESSION OF THE PREMISES.
(F) IF A PARK OWNER DISPOSES OF THE ABANDONED PROPERTY OF THE
RESIDENT BY SALE, THE RESIDENT SHALL BE ENTITLED TO ANY PROCEEDS OF THE
SALE THAT EXCEED RENT DUE AND UNPAID FEES OWED BY THE RESIDENT TO THE
PARK OWNER.
(G) IF IN ANY PROCEEDING A COURT DETERMINES THAT A PARK OWNER
VIOLATED A PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, THE RESIDENT MAY RECOVER:
(1) ACTUAL DAMAGES;
(2) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS; AND
(3) ANY OTHER REMEDY THE COURT FINDS REASONABLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before December 1, 2026, the Maryland Judiciary shall develop and
publish on its website a form titled “Notice of Intent to File a Complaint for Repossession
– 37 –

Ch. 754 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
of the Premises” to facilitate the implementation of § 8A–1701 of the Real Property Article,
as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) The form required under subsection (a) of this section shall include:
(1) The date the notice is provided to the resident or subtenant of the park;
(2) A specific description of the alleged violation by the resident or
subtenant under § 8A–1101 or § 8A–1703 of the Real Property Article, as enacted by Section
1 of this Act;
(3) A statement containing information on rental assistance programs if
the notice was provided for the nonpayment of rent;
(4) The contact information of the park owner;
(5) If applicable, a statement that the resident or subtenant has 10 days
after receipt of the notice to cure the nonpayment of rent before the park owner may initiate
an action for repossession in the District Court;
(6) A statement that the resident has the legal right to dispute the violation
alleged under Title 8A, Subtitle 17 of the Real Property Article, as enacted by Section 1 of
this Act;
(7) Contact information for nonprofit legal services organizations that may
provide legal advice or access to legal representation to the resident or subtenant, as
compiled by the Maryland Legal Services Corporation; and
(8) Contact information for the following resources of the court:
(i) The Alternative Dispute Resolution Office; and
(ii) The Self–Help Center.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to:
(1) any cause of action for repossession of the premises for failure to pay
rent, breach of rental agreement, or holdover under Title 8A, Subtitle 17 of the Real
Property Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, initiated before the effective date of
this Act; or
(2) any rental agreement entered into before the effective date of this Act.
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 754
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 8A–404 through
8A–406 of Article – Real Property of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be
Section(s) 8A–403 through 8A–405, respectively.
SECTION 5. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 39 –